Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-548
Shipments; weighing; certificates.

The owner, consignor, or consignee of any carload lots of grain, coal, merchandise, or other property in course of transportation over any railroad within the state, transporting the same for hire, may request in writing any agent of the operators of such railroad to weigh any such carloads of grain, coal, merchandise, or other property in course of transportation. Upon such a request being received, it shall become the duty of the operators of such railroad to weigh the car or cars designated in such written request, together with their contents, upon such track scale as may be designated in such written request, over which such car or cars in the regular course of transit will thereafter pass, and deliver to the person making such request a written certificate showing the name and number of the car so weighed, the date of the taking of such weight, and the place where weighed, with the number of pounds of gross and net weights, after deducting the tare marked on the car from such gross weight. The certificate so executed and delivered shall be admissible evidence against such railroad in any legal proceeding, thereafter instituted or then pending against any such railroad weighing and transporting the property contained in such car or cars, of all the facts stated in such certificate.

Laws 1907, c. 88, § 3, p. 307;

R.S.1913, § 6007;

C.S.1922, § 5352;

C.S.1929, § 74-535;

R.S.1943, § 74-548;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 5.